Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-614
Revocation and suspension of permits; grounds.

(1) When a person pleads guilty to or is convicted of any violation listed in this subsection, the court shall, in addition to any other penalty, revoke and require the immediate surrender of all permits to hunt, fish, and harvest fur held by such person and suspend the privilege of such person to hunt, fish, and harvest fur and to purchase such permits for a period of not less than three years. The court shall consider the number and severity of the violations of the Game Law in determining the length of the revocation and suspension. The violations shall be:

(a) Carelessly or purposely killing or causing injury to livestock with a firearm or bow and arrow;

(b) Purposely taking or having in his or her possession a number of game animals, game fish, game birds, or fur-bearing animals exceeding twice the limit established pursuant to section 37-314;

(c) Taking any species of wildlife protected by the Game Law during a closed season in violation of section 37-502;

(d) Resisting or obstructing any officer or any employee of the commission in the discharge of his or her lawful duties in violation of section 37-609; and

(e) Being a habitual offender of the Game Law.

(2) When a person pleads guilty to or is convicted of any violation listed in this subsection, the court may, in addition to any other penalty, revoke and require the immediate surrender of all permits to hunt, fish, and harvest fur held by such person and suspend the privilege of such person to hunt, fish, and harvest fur and to purchase such permits for a period of not less than one year. The court shall consider the number and severity of the violations of the Game Law in determining the length of the revocation and suspension. The violations shall be:

(a) Hunting, fishing, or fur harvesting without a permit in violation of section 37-411;

(b) Hunting from a vehicle, aircraft, or boat in violation of section 37-513, 37-514, 37-515, 37-535, or 37-538; and

(c) Knowingly taking any wildlife on private land without permission in violation of section 37-722.

(3) When a person pleads guilty to or is convicted of any violation of the Game Law, the rules and regulations of the commission, or commission orders not listed in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court may, in addition to any other penalty, revoke and require the immediate surrender of all permits to hunt, fish, and harvest fur held by such person and suspend the privilege of such person to hunt, fish, and harvest fur and to purchase such permits for a period of not less than one year.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 304;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 89;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB5, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 16;

Laws 2017, LB566, § 4.